src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.aff
SFX n Y 18
SFX n ai gu .
SFX n ai ga .
SFX n ai gas .
SFX n ai gat .
SFX n ai gant .
SFX n ai ghi .  
SFX n ai ghis .  
SFX n ai ghist .  
SFX n ai ghit . 
SFX n ai gheus .
SFX n ai gheis .   
SFX n ai ghint .  
SFX n ai ghessi .    
SFX n ai ghessis .    
SFX n ai ghessit .    
SFX n ai ghéssimus .  
SFX n ai ghestis .    
SFX n ai ghessint . 

SFX q Y 5
SFX q a as a
SFX q a at a
SFX q a ant a
SFX q a o a
SFX q a alu/v a

# fai - podi  (de fa tzu- po tzu)

SFX r Y 34
SFX r i is i
SFX r i it i
SFX r tzu deus tzu
SFX r tzu deis tzu
SFX r tzu demu tzu
SFX r tzu dia tzu
SFX r tzu diast tzu
SFX r tzu dias tzu
SFX r tzu diat tzu
SFX r tzu demus tzu
SFX r tzu destis tzu
SFX r tzu destus tzu
SFX r tzu diant tzu
SFX r u a tzu
SFX r u as tzu
SFX r u at tzu
SFX r u aus tzu
SFX r u ais tzu
SFX r u ant tzu
SFX r i i/def i
SFX r ai ei/def fai
SFX r tzu dei/def tzu
SFX r tzu dessi tzu
SFX r tzu dessis tzu 
SFX r tzu dessit tzu  
SFX r tzu déssimus tzu
SFX r tzu destis tzu  
SFX r tzu dessint tzu
SFX r tzu dendi/def tzu
SFX r tzu dendu/def tzu
SFX r i endi/def fai
SFX r i endu/def fai
SFX r ai endi/def fai
SFX r ai endu/def fai

SFX v Y 9
SFX v lu mi lu
SFX v lu ti lu
SFX v lu di lu
SFX v lu la lu
SFX v lu las lu
SFX v lu los lu
SFX v lu nnos lu
SFX v lu li lu
SFX v lu lis lu

# prandi (su part. est in X) - oprimi (cun part.)

SFX x Y 49
SFX x i u [^cgh] i # prandu
SFX x hi u [cg]hi 
SFX x i u dhi
SFX x i is i # discutis
SFX x i it i # ..
SFX x i eus i 
SFX x i eis i
SFX x i int i
SFX x i emu i  
SFX x i iast i  # 
SFX x i ias i #
SFX x i iat i  # 
SFX x i emus i  #  
SFX x i estus i  #  
SFX x i iant i  # 
SFX x i aus [^cgh] i # 
SFX x hi aus [cg]hi 
SFX x i aus dhi
SFX x i iaus [cg]i 
SFX x i ais [^cgh] i # 
SFX x hi ais [cg]hi 
SFX x i ais dhi
SFX x i iais [cg]i 
SFX x i a [^cgh] i #
SFX x hi a [cg]hi 
SFX x i a dhi
SFX x i a [cg]i 
SFX x i as [^cgh] i #
SFX x hi as [cg]hi 
SFX x i as dhi
SFX x i as [cg]i 
SFX x i at [^cgh] i #
SFX x hi at [cg]hi 
SFX x i at dhi
SFX x i at [cg]i 
SFX x i ant [^cgh] i #
SFX x hi ant [cg]hi 
SFX x i ant dhi
SFX x i ant [cg]i 
SFX x i essi i  #  finessi
SFX x i essis i  #  finessis
SFX x i essit i  #  finessit
SFX x i éssimus i  #  finéssimus
SFX x i estis i  #  finestis
SFX x i essint i  #  finessint
SFX x i ei/def i  #  finei
SFX x i i/def i  #  finimí
SFX x i endi/def i
SFX x i endu/def i

SFX y Y 17
SFX y imi ìmiu/D imi # esprimi
SFX y isti ístu/D isti # arresisti
SFX y iti ítiu/D iti # promiti
SFX y ivi íviu/D ivi #bivi
SFX y ompi ómpiu/D ompi # lompi
SFX y osci ósciu/D osci # arrosci
SFX y ovi óviu/D ovi # movi
SFX y udi údiu/D udi # illudi
SFX y ulli úlliu/D ulli # mulli
SFX y undi úndiu/D undi # tundi
SFX y usi úsiu/D usi # tradusi
SFX y xi xu/D xi # praxi
SFX y oci otu/D oci # troci
SFX y ui utu/D ui # allui
SFX y ci tu/D ci # binci
SFX y gi tu/D gi # acingi
SFX y ghi tu/D ghi #

REP 24
REP d dh
REP dh d
REP dd dh
REP dh dd
REP d dd
REP dd d
REP ff f
REP pp p
REP cc c
REP tt t
REP vv v
REP z tz
REP zz tz
REP mm m
REP m mm
REP b bb
REP bb b
REP j i
REP i j
REP y i
REP ny gn
REP gn nn
REP nn gn
REP q c


MAP 5
MAP aáàâ
MAP eèé
MAP iìí
MAP oòó
MAP uùú
