src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abàngia/q
abbàngia/q
abbannònalu/v
abbàscia/q
abbeltúdalu/v
abbertighèdhalu/v
abbígia/q
abbinzínalu/v
abbíscia/q
abbofètalu/v
abbògia/q
abborressi/xy
abbòzalu/v
abbrúnchia/mn
abbrunchílalu/v
abbrúncia/q
abbrúscia/q
abbúgnalu/v
abbúngia/q
abburrúscia/q
abburvúdhalu/v
abbúscia/q
abèsalu/v
abiesci/xy
acàbida/mn
acaminzònalu/v
acànscia/q
acarvònalu/v
acerri/xy
achedhònalu/v
achèscia/q
achíngia/q
achintòrzalu/v
achíscia/q
aciúpalu/v
acoltàzalu/v
acòncia/q
acontessi/xy
acòrgia/q
acòrralu/v
acràgalu/v
acuculièdhalu/v
acudi/xyb
acumpànzalu/v
acuntessi/xy
acúscia/q
addevínalu/v
addríngalu/v
addusi/xy
afàdalu/v
afàscia/q
afatúnzalu/v
afiàncalu/v
aflui/xyb
afògalu/v
afrínalu/v
afuntènelu/v
aggàtalu/v
aggrugalu/v
aggrúncia/q
agiòrralu/v
aiscúrtalu/v
allàlgalu/v
allèntalu/v
allínnalu/v
allómbura/mn
alloròscalu/v
allui/xy
allumíngia/q
allútalu/v
ammacarínalu/v
ammalíscia/q
ammammarítzalu/v
ammàrtura/mn
ammatúnzalu/v
amméria/mn
ammessèdalu/v
ammíscia/q
ammítilu/v
ammortisínalu/v
ammúrgia/q
ammurràlalu/v
ammutessi/xy
amòralu/v
amplífica/mn
annièntalu/v
antibítzalu/v
apàgia/q
apàjalu/v
aparri/xy
apàssalu/v
apèntalu/v
apèscia/q
apetessi/xy
apiantònalu/v
apipíralu/v
apitzínnalu/v
apògia/q
aporri/xy
apostòrzalu/v
aprància/q
aproèrzalu/v
aprópia/mn
apugnàlalu/v
apunciu/DZr
arboressi/xy
àrcia/mn
argumèntalu/v
arrachedi/xy
arràmbalu/v
arràngia/q
arrebbússalu/v
arrechedi/xy
arredimi/xy
arregi/xyb
arregogli/xyb
arregolli/xyb
arregoxi/xyb
arrei/xyb
arremàzalu/v
arreminti/xyb
arremissi/xyb
arrendi/xyb
arrennesci/y
arreprimi/xy
arresiònalu/v
àrrida/mn
arrochítalu/v
arródia/mn
arroi/xyb
arróllia/mn
arrosci/xyb
arrui/xyb
artúdhalu/v
àrtzia/mn
asciolli/xyb
assànnalu/v
assébiu/DZr
assélia/mn
asséria/mn
asseri/xyb
assétia/mn
assigúralu/v
assisti/xyb
assólia/mn
assolvi/xyb
assótzia/mn
assufràtalu/v
assumi/xyb
assuncúrriri/xy
assutíliga/mn
astringhèndhelu/v
atàcia/q
atendhíelu/v
atendi/xyb
atètera/mn
ati/xyb
atóbia/mn
atóchida/mn
atólia/mn
atòscalu/v
atrai/xyb
atúralu/v
aúnzalu/v
avístalu/v
bàgiula/mn
baràga/q
bardànalu/v
bàtia/mn
batígia/q
bendi/xyb
bètalu/v
béula/mn
biàsciu/DZr
binci/xyb
bivi/xyb
bòcalu/v
boli/xb
bríncalu/v
brúfula/mn
brúgia/q
brundessi/xyb
búllalu/v
cadòjalu/v
càgia/q
càlcula/mn
càlibbra/mn
càmbia/mn
campània/mn
càmpalu/v
candessi/xyb
cànscia/q
capi/xyb
capi/xyb
carèsalu/v
càriga/mn
càrmina/mn
carràgia/q
càrriga/mn
càstia/mn
càtzalu/v
cedi/xyb
cerri/xyb
cerrixerri/xy
chènscia/q
cherricherri/xy
chèscia/q
chinghíelu/v
chitirighiti/xyb
ciàciara/mn
ciascòtalu/v
cingi/xyb
ciuexi/xyb
cíula/mn
ciúncia/q
cògia/q
coi/xb
colòrilu/v
comúniga/mn
concoi/xyb
condusi/xyb
cónia/mn
contónia/mn
contrària/mn
contulàrzalu/v
córdina/mn
corrigi/xyb
cradamíssalu/v
crai/xyb
cràmina/mn
cràstula/mn
cresci/xyb
crícalu/v
crócula/mn
cucúcia/q
cugúdhalu/v
culimpipi/xyb
cumbati/xyb
cúmbida/mn
cummovi/xyb
cumpeti/xyb
cumponi/xyb
cumprèndhelu/v
cumprendi/xyb
cumpromiti/xyb
cuncurri/xyb
cunfundi/xyb
cunsisti/xyb
cuntràstalu/v
cunverti/xyb
curri/xy
curri/xyb
currumpi/xyb
custrínghelu/v
dannífica/mn
decidi/xyb
defendi/xyb
déguma/mn
dejúnalu/v
dèlega/mn
depi/xyb
deprimi/xy
desaggradessi/xyb
desluxi/xyb
destrui/xyb
dexi/xyb
difundi/xyb
dillíria/mn
dimmàjalu/v
dirigi/xy
disaggradessi/xyb
discurri/xyb
disonòralu/v
dispàcia/q
displaxi/xyb
dispraxi/xyb
distinghíndhelu/v
doli/xyb
dómina/mn
donai/Jnb
drínnilu/v
eligi/xyb
esclaressi/xyb
esigi/xyb
esponni/xy
esprèssalu/v
estendi/xyb
fai/rb
fatzu/rb
fàstidia/mn
fastízalu/v
fírmalu/v
flachessi/xyb
folfígia/q
folla/CZar
fortalessi/xyb
franghítelu/v
frícalu/v
fríscia/q
frúscia/q
frúscina/q
fúlia/mn
fúlmina/mn
funtziònalu/v
gàrriga/mn
giaítalu/v
giúdica/mn
gòsalu/v
ifúndhelu/v
ilgiúnalu/v
illàdera/mn
illompi/xyb
illòralu/v
illúina/mn
illúmina/mn
imbalesci/xyb
imbàlsama/mn
imbècia/q
imbenúgalu/v
imbenúgia/q
imbidessi/xyb
imbògia/q
imbregungiu/DZr
imbrémiga/mn
imbressi/xyb
imbròcalu/v
imi/xy
immagasínalu/v
immàgina/mn
impànnalu/v
impérria/mn
impícalu/v
impoberessi/xyb
impodhalu/v
imponi/xyb
impràtia/mn
impresònalu/v
imprimi/xy
impríngia/q
impúncia/q
incalàncalu/v
incarchínalu/v
incaressi/xyb
incàscia/q
incaúngia/q
incímilu/v
incrabístalu/v
incrésia/mn
incríspia/mn
incrofi/xyb
incubònalu/v
indépida/mn
indíscia/q
indormíscalu/v
induressi/xyb
infàula/mn
inferri/xyb
infíniga/mn
infòrmalu/v
infundi/xyb
ingénia/mn
inghísalu/v
ingrandessi/xyb
ingràtzia/mn
innamòralu/v
inniédhiga/mn
innóiga/mn
insisti/xyb
insòlalu/v
insórdiga/mn
insutíliga/mn
intébia/mn
intendi/xyb
interrumpi/xyb
intessi/xyb
intràmalu/v
introdusi/xyb
intuxu/AZax
intzèrtalu/v
inverti/xyb
irbadhínalu/v
irbòzalu/v
irfarínalu/v
irfurtícalu/v
irmòntalu/v
irrèdalu/v
irvúrzalu/v
isazèralu/v
isbàmbàrria/mn
isbélia/mn
iscabbulli/xyb
iscallèntalu/v
iscàncara/mn
iscaresci/xyb
iscarràfia/mn
iscarràscia/q
iscàrtzalu/v
iscàvia/mn
iscàvula/mn
ischinghíndhelu/v
isciòpera/mn
isclaressi/xyb
iscodínalu/v
iscomúniga/mn
iscontriarzu/DZn
iscòrgia/q
iscórria/mn
iscòscia/q
iscòssalu/v
iscóvia/mn
iscrafi/xyb
iscrei/xyb
iscresci/xyb
iscrícalu/v
iscuàrtara/mn
iscúcura/mn
iscúgia/q
iscúlalu/v
iscummiti/xyb
iscumponi/xyb
iscúngia/q
iscúpilu/v
iscurri/xyb
isdogànalu/v
isfai/rb
isfatzu/rb
isfàscia/q
isfíniga/mn
isfúmalu/v
ísola/mn
isorúlalu/v
ispàcia/q
ispàina/mn
ispanzòlalu/v
isparessi/xyb
ispargi/xyb
ispàrtzina/mn
ispàssia/mn
ispendi/xyb
ispéntuma/mn
isperdi/xyb
isperdíscia/q
isperdítzia/mn
ispérria/mn
ispérruma/mn
ispícalu/v
ispingi/xyb
ispínnia/mn
ispítzula/mn
ispràgia/q
ispràjalu/v
ispraxi/xyb
ispremi/xyb
isprondi/xyb
isprundi/xyb
ispundi/xyb
Errore!alu/v
istendi/xyb
istentéria/mn
istésia/mn
istídhia/mn
istòrralu/v
istràvia/mn
istringi/xyb
istrobògia/q
istrópia/mn
istrúmpalu/v
istúdia/mn
isúngia/q
làgrima/mn
lampaluxi/xyb
làuda/mn
léntina/mn
lezídelu/v
líbbera/mn
ligi/xyb
límpia/mn
limúsina/mn
lincuanceri/IZn
lingi/xyb
lompi/xyb
lungi/xyb
luxi/xyb
maledixi/xyb
malesci/xyb
mancarri/xyb
mància/q
màrmura/mn
martèdhalu/v
matzialadu/DZn
màtzula/mn
màula/mn
medesci/xyb
menesci/xyb
meresci/xyb
méria/mn
mérita/mn
méula/mn
miàula/mn
mighirimighi/xyb
mimi/xy
minesci/xyb
minti/xyb
miriàgalu/v
missi/xyb
moli/xyb
mordi/xyb
movi/xyb
múgia/q
mulli/xyb
multíplica/mn
murdi/xyb
murri/xyb
múscia/mn
musúngia/q
mútila/mn
mútilu/v
nasci/xyb
nàviga/mn
nècia/q
nogi/xyb
nómina/mn
noxi/xyb
númera/mn
obbedessi/xyb
obbresci/xyb
óbia/mn
obresci/xyb
ócupa/mn
ocurri/xyb
ódia/mn
ofendi/xyb
ofendi/xy
ògia/q
ólia/mn
òpera/mn
oponi/xyb
oprimi/xy
orbesci/xyb
órdina/mn
oriòlalu/v
orroi/xyb
orrui/xyb
oscuressi/xyb
óssida/mn
otzipi/xyb
pàrtilu/v
pasci/xyb
pendi/xyb
penúria/mn
perdi/xyb
perfetziònalu/v
perífica/mn
perítzia/mn
permiti/xyb
pertungi/xyb
pètena/mn
pibiribibi/xyb
pígia/q
pipi/xyb
piríncia/q
píscia/q
pistròncalu/v
píula/mn
plangi/xyb
plaxi/xyb
podi/rb
potzu/rb
podhi/xyb
poni/xyb
ponni/xyg
prància/q
prandi/xyb
pranghi/xyb
prangi/xyb
pràtiga/mn
praxi/xyb
prédica/mn
prémia/mn
premmi/xyb
prènalu/v
preócupa/mn
prescendi/xyb
presumu/AZax
pretendi/xyb
prétzia/mn
prevali/xyb
proi/xyb
promovi/xyb
pronóstica/mn
pronúntzia/mn
proponídelu/v
protegi/xyb
pudesci/xyb
púliga/mn
purífica/mn
ràsiga/mn
ratífica/mn
reassumi/xyb
reconosci/xyb
recumàndhalu/v
redusi/xyb
régula/mn
remiti/xyb
renesci/xyb
renúntzia/mn
resisti/xyb
respingi/xyb
resumu/AZax
resúrtalu/v
retroci/xyb
ringràtzia/mn
rispàrmia/mn
ródia/mn
rósiga/mn
rúcia/q
rúgia/q
ruíalu/v
rúmbula/mn
sacrífica/mn
salàrgia/q
sàmuna/mn
sàrcia/q
sàrtia/mn
sbati/xyb
sbisuriu/DZr
scabulli/xyb
scadessi/xyb
scaresci/xyb
schesci/xyb
sciadra/CZar
scrafi/xyb
scummiti/xy
scumponni/xy
sdurri/xyb
sèbera/mn
sei/xyb
sèmalu/v
senténtzia/mn
serpi/xyb
setzi/xyb
sfai/rb
sfatzu/rb
signífica/mn
solòbralu/v
spargi/xyb
spondi/xyb
sprondi/xyb
spurra/CZar
sterri/xyb
stolli/xy
stràngiu/DZr
stringi/xyb
sucurri/xyb
sumbúzalu/v
suncurri/xyb
sussedi/xyb
tàcalu/v
tébia/mn
tendi/xyb
tessídelu/v
tilíngia/q
tingi/xyb
tírria/mn
traixi/xyb
tràmpalu/v
tratiajolu/DZn
tràviga/mn
tremi/xyb
tríbbula/mn
trinchítalu/v
trobògia/q
trochígia/q
trodhiànciulu/DZn
trodhi/xyb
trofígia/q
tzacàrralu/v
tzàpula/mn
tzàvia/mn
umidessi/xyb
unífica/mn
vària/mn
vendhítelu/v
vídima/mn
